Ohio, session 136, HB650.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. (A) The Frontier Technologies and Quantum Commission is established to study the rapid development of frontier technologies with significant economic, ethical, and security implications for the state, including, but not limited to, artificial intelligence and agentic systems, biotechnology, quantum developments, and robotics. The primary objectives of the Commission shall be to do all of the following: (1) Determine the necessity for a permanent statewide commission to study and address issues related to frontier technologies; (2) Examine the economic and workforce impact of frontier technologies; (3) Examine security and infrastructure resilience; (4) Consider ethical standards for responsible development and use of frontier technologies. (B) The Commission shall consist of the following eight members of the General Assembly: (1) Four members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, three of whom shall be from the majority party and one of whom shall be from the minority party. The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall consult with the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives regarding the appointment of a member of the minority party. The Speaker shall designate one member from the three majority party appointees to serve as co-chairperson of the Commission. (2) Four members of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate, three of whom shall be from the majority party and one of whom shall be from the minority party. The President of the Senate shall consult with the Minority Leader of the Senate regarding the appointment of a member of the minority party. The President shall designate one member from the three majority party appointees to serve as co-chairperson of the Commission. (C) The Legislative Service Commission shall, upon request, provide support services to the Frontier Technologies and Quantum Commission. (D) The Frontier Technologies and Quantum Commission shall meet at the call of the co-chairpersons, and at a frequency established by the co-chairpersons, to discuss relevant technological developments and to receive invited testimony from experts. The Commission shall prepare and deliver a report of its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly, in accordance with division (B) of section 101.68 of the Revised Code, not later than December 31, 2026. The Commission ceases to exist upon completion of the report. (E) Members of the Commission are not entitled to compensation for service on the Commission except to the extent that serving as a member coincides with the individual's regular duties of employment, and except for the reimbursement of actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties on the Commission.